Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-333
False statement or book entry; penalty.

Every person who shall willfully or knowingly subscribe, or make, or cause to be made, any false statement or any false entries in any book of any association organized for the purpose set forth in section 8-302, or exhibit any false paper with the intent to deceive any person authorized to examine into the affairs of such association, or shall make, state or publish any false statement of the financial condition of such association, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 17, p. 93;

R.S.1913, § 502;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 18, p. 731;

C.S.1922, § 8100;

C.S.1929, § 8-318;

R.S.1943, § 8-333;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 57.